src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_kaahus_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kááhuš: # MLO, ok
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Nom: kááhuš
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Gen: kahhuu
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Acc: kahhuu
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Ill: kahhuužân
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Loc: kahhuust
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Com: kahhuin
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Abe: kahhuuttáá
    kááhuš+N+Ess: kahhuužin
    kááhuš+N+Par: kahhuužid
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Nom: kahhuuh
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Gen: kahhui
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Acc: kahhuid
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Ill: kahhuid
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Loc: kahhuin
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Com: [kahhuiguin, kahhuigijn]
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Abe: kahhuittáá

  Noun - ááhuš: # MLO, checked
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Nom: ááhuš
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Gen: ahhuu
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Acc: ahhuu
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Ill: ahhuužân
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Loc: ahhuust
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Com: ahhuin
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Abe: ahhuuttáá
    ááhuš+N+Ess: ahhuužin
    ááhuš+N+Par: ahhuužid
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Nom: ahhuuh
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Gen: ahhui
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Acc: ahhuid
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Ill: ahhuid
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Loc: ahhuin
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Com: [ahhuiguin, ahhuigijn]
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Abe: ahhuittáá


    
 
